Mississippi, session 2026, HB531.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 9-5-49, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: [Until January 1, 2027, this section shall read as follows:] 9-5-49.  * * *(1)  The Sixteenth Chancery Court District is composed of the following counties: (a)  George County; (b)  Greene County; and (c)  Jackson County. * * *(2)  The local contributions required for the maintenance of the Sixteenth Chancery Court District shall be paid on a pro rata basis by each county in the district based on the proportion of that county's population to the district as a whole according to the most recent federal decennial census.  The amount of the local contributions under this subsection (2) shall be determined by the Jackson County Board of Supervisors to be ordered by the senior chancellor of the Sixteenth Chancery Court District. [From January 1, 2027, and until January 1, 2031, this section shall read as follows:] 9-5-49. * * *(1) The Sixteenth Chancery Court District is composed of the following counties: (a)  George County; and (b)  Jackson County. * * *(2)  The local contributions required for the maintenance of the Sixteenth Chancery Court District shall be paid on a pro rata basis by each county in the district based on the proportion of that county's population to the district as a whole according to the most recent federal decennial census.  The amount of the local contributions under this subsection (2) shall be determined by the Jackson County Board of Supervisors to be ordered by the senior chancellor of the Sixteenth Chancery Court District. [From and after January 1, 2031, this section shall read as follows:] 9-5-49.  The Sixteenth Chancery Court District shall be Jackson County. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.